Utah statutes.
17B-1-1104.   Pledge of revenues to pay for bonds.

Bonds may be payable from and secured by the pledge of all or any specified part of:

(1)  the revenues to be derived by the district from providing its services and from the operation of its facilities and other properties;

(2)  sales and use taxes, property taxes, and other taxes;

(3)  federal, state, or local grants;

(4)  in the case of special assessment bonds, the special assessments pledged to repay the special assessment bonds; and

(5)  other money legally available to the district.

